Washington statutes.
RCW 7.70.130

Mandatory mediation of health care claims—Exempt from arbitration mandate.

A cause of action that has been mediated as provided in RCW 7.70.100 shall be exempt from any superior court civil rules mandating arbitration of civil actions or participation in settlement conferences prior to trial.

[ 1993 c 492 s 423.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—1993 c 492: See notes following RCW 43.20.050.

Short title—Savings—Reservation of legislative power—Effective dates—1993 c 492: See RCW 43.72.910 through 43.72.915.